Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.050

Participation of state agencies.

Each of the following agencies must fully participate in the implementation of this chapter:

(1) Department of agriculture;

(2) Secretary of state;

(3) Department of social and health services;

(4) Department of revenue;

(5) Department of fish and wildlife;

(6) Employment security department;

(7) Department of labor and industries;

(8) Liquor and cannabis board;

(9) Department of health;

(10) Department of licensing;

(11) Utilities and transportation commission;

(12) Board of accountancy;

(13) Department of archaeology and historic preservation;

(14) Department of children, youth, and families;

(15) Department of ecology;

(16) Department of financial institutions;

(17) Department of transportation;

(18) Gambling commission;

(19) Horse racing commission;

(20) Office of the insurance commissioner;

(21) State lottery;

(22) Student achievement council;

(23) Washington state patrol;

(24) Workforce training and education coordinating board; and

(25) Other agencies as determined by the governor.

[ 2018 c 58 s 33; 2013 c 111 s 1; 2011 c 298 s 6; 1997 c 391 s 11; 1994 c 264 s 8; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 317; 1985 c 466 s 38; 1979 c 158 s 78; 1977 ex.s. c 319 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.